test/tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/fstspeller-gt-norm-yamls/CmpN-tests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
    # SgNomLeft only
    # skohtermáilbmi = CmpN/SgG
    # ihtaluddamat = CmpN/SgNomLeft, CmpN/SgGenLeft, CmpN/PlGenLeft
    skohtermáilbmi+N+Sem/Plc-abstr+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#ihtaluddamat+N+Sem/State-sick+Pl+Nom: [~skohter#má#ilbme#ihtaluddamat]
    skohtermáilbmi+N+Sem/Plc-abstr+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#ihtaluddamat+N+Sem/State-sick+Pl+Nom: [~skohter#má#ilmme#ihtaluddamat, skohter#má#ilmmi#ihtaluddamat]
    skohtermáilbmi+N+Sem/Plc-abstr+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#ihtaluddamat+N+Sem/State-sick+Pl+Nom: [ skohter#má#ilmmiid#ihtaluddamat]

  CmpN/PlGenLeft tests:
    # čálgobuorri - default
    # hálddahangeavat +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft:
    čálgobuorri+N+Sem/Semcon+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#hálddahangeavat+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [~čálgo#buorre#hálddahan#geavat]
    čálgobuorri+N+Sem/Semcon+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#hálddahangeavat+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [ čálgo#buore#hálddahan#geavat ]
    čálgobuorri+N+Sem/Semcon+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#hálddahangeavat+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [ čálgo#buriid#hálddahan#geavat]

    # čálasátni: default
    # gearggaheapme: A+CmpN/PlG - N+A, blokkert:
    čálasátni+N+Sem/Cat+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gearggaheapme+A+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom: ~čála#sániid#gearggaheapme

    # sarvvis: all Cmp forms, +CmpN/PlGenLeft, Der/NomAct all Left forms
    sarvvis+N+Sem/Ani+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#savdnjit+Ex/V+TV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess: [sarvves#savdnjimin, sarvves#savdnjimen]
    sarvvis+N+Sem/Ani+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#savdnjit+Ex/V+TV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess: [sarvá#savdnjimin,   sarvá#savdnjimen  ]
    sarvvis+N+Sem/Ani+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#savdnjit+Ex/V+TV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess: [sarváid#savdnjimin, sarváid#savdnjimen]
    
    # giljanas: default
    # mieškkuheaddji: Der/NomAg: all Left forms
    giljanas+N+Sem/Prod-audio+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mieškkuhit+Ex/V+TV+Der2+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Nom:  giljanas#mieškkuheaddjit
    giljanas+N+Sem/Prod-audio+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#mieškkuhit+Ex/V+TV+Der2+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Nom:  giljanas#mieškkuheaddjit    # XXX earlier form: giljanasa#mieškkuheaddjit - but according to lexc there is no final -a in the sgGen form - check with Duommá
    giljanas+N+Sem/Prod-audio+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#mieškkuhit+Ex/V+TV+Der2+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Nom:  giljanasaid#mieškkuheaddjit

    giljanas+N+Sem/Prod-audio+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mieškkuhit+Ex/V+TV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom: giljanas#mieškkuheamit
    giljanas+N+Sem/Prod-audio+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#mieškkuhit+Ex/V+TV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom: giljanas#mieškkuheamit
    giljanas+N+Sem/Prod-audio+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#mieškkuhit+Ex/V+TV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom: giljanasaid#mieškkuheamit

    # Control test: make sure also plain derivations are accepted as is:
    mieškkuhit+Ex/V+TV+Der2+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Nom: mieškkuheaddjit

  CmpN/DefPlGen tests: # Def tags do not exist anymore, these tests serve to further check that Left tags are working
    savdnjit+Ex/V+TV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#seastu+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [savdnjin#seastu, savdnjen#seastu] # +CmpN/DefPlGen & DefSgGen  + seastu all Left
    savdnjit+Ex/V+TV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#seastu+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [savdnjima#seastu  ] # +CmpN/DefPlGen & DefSgGen  + seastu all Left
    savdnjit+Ex/V+TV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#seastu+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [savdnjimiid#seastu] # +CmpN/DefPlGen & DefSgGen  + seastu all Left

    seavnnjáš+N+Sem/Time+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#seastu+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [seavnnjáš#seastu   ]                 # CmpN/DefPlGen + seastu all Left
    seavnnjáš+N+Sem/Time+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#seastu+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [seavnnjáš#seastu, seavnnjáža#seastu] # CmpN/DefPlGen + seastu all Left
    seavnnjáš+N+Sem/Time+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#seastu+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [seavnnjážiid#seastu]                 # CmpN/DefPlGen + seastu all Left

    # sesoŋŋaáigi: CmpN/SgN, CmpN/SgG, CmpN/SgNomLeft, CmpN/SgGenLeft,CmpN/PlGenLeft
    sekšuvdna+N+Sem/Org+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#sesoŋŋaáigi+v1+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [sekšuvdna#sesoŋŋa#áigi, sekšun#sesoŋŋa#áigi] # +CmpN/DefSgGen  + +CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft
    sekšuvdna+N+Sem/Org+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#sesoŋŋaáigi+v1+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [sekšuvnna#sesoŋŋa#áigi  ] # +CmpN/DefSgGen  + +CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft
    sekšuvdna+N+Sem/Org+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#sesoŋŋaáigi+v1+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [sekšuvnnaid#sesoŋŋa#áigi] # +CmpN/DefSgGen  + +CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft
    sekšuvdna+N+Sem/Org+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#sesoŋŋaáigi+v2+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [sekšuvdna#sesoŋga#áigi, sekšun#sesoŋga#áigi] # +CmpN/DefSgGen  + +CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft
    sekšuvdna+N+Sem/Org+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#sesoŋŋaáigi+v2+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [sekšuvnna#sesoŋga#áigi  ] # +CmpN/DefSgGen  + +CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft
    sekšuvdna+N+Sem/Org+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#sesoŋŋaáigi+v2+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [sekšuvnnaid#sesoŋga#áigi] # +CmpN/DefSgGen  + +CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft

    # seksuálaláhkarihkkunlávdegoddi+N+Cmp#sesoŋŋaáigi+N+Sg+Nom: seksuálaláhkarihkkunlávdegottesesoŋŋaáigi  # +CmpN/DefSgGen - outcommented because hfst takes an enormous amount of time analysng this
